Illinois, session 104th, SB83.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Probate Act of 1975 is amended by changing 5Section 25-1 as follows: 6    (755 ILCS 5/25-1)  (from Ch. 110 1/2, par. 25-1)7    Sec. 25-1. Payment or delivery of small estate of decedent 8upon affidavit.9    (a) When any person, corporation, or financial institution 10(1) indebted to or holding personal estate of a decedent, (2) 11controlling the right of access to decedent's safe deposit box 12or (3) acting as registrar or transfer agent of any evidence of 13interest, indebtedness, property or right is furnished with a 14small estate affidavit in substantially the form hereinafter 15set forth, that person, corporation, or financial institution 16shall pay the indebtedness, grant access to the safe deposit 17box, deliver the personal estate or transfer or issue the 18evidence of interest, indebtedness, property or right to 19persons and in the manner specified in the affidavit or to an 20agent appointed as hereinafter set forth.21    (a-5) The small estate affidavit set forth in subsection 22(b) may be used to transfer personal property in a decedent's 23estate if:  SB0083 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 02999 LNS 13017 b1        (1) no letters of office are outstanding on the 2    decedent's estate and no petition for letters is 3    contemplated or pending in this State or in any other 4    jurisdiction; and5        (2) the decedent's personal estate passing to any 6    party by intestacy or under a will is limited to:7            (A) excluding motor vehicles registered with the 8        Secretary of State, tangible and intangible personal 9        property not exceeding $150,000; and10            (B) motor vehicles registered with the Secretary 11        of State.12    For purposes of this Section, if the small estate 13affidavit as set forth in subsection (b) is being used solely 14for a title transaction with the Secretary of State for the 15transfer of the decedent's motor vehicles, it may be used to 16transfer those motor vehicles in accordance with subsection 17(b) of Section 3-114 of Illinois Vehicle Code without 18consideration of the value of the decedent's personal estate. 19    (b)        Small Estate Affidavit20    I,        (name of affiant)    , on oath state:21    1.  (a) My post office address is:                      ;22        (b) My residence address is:                    ; and23        (c) I understand that, if I am an out-of-state 24resident, I submit myself to the jurisdiction of Illinois 25courts for all matters related to the preparation and use of 26this affidavit. My agent for service of process in Illinois   SB0083 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 02999 LNS 13017 b1is:2NAME..........................3ADDRESS.......................4CITY..........................5TELEPHONE (IF ANY)............6I understand that if no person is named above as my agent for 7service or, if for any reason, service on the named person 8cannot be effectuated, the clerk of the circuit court of 9......(County) (Judicial Circuit) Illinois is recognized by 10Illinois law as my agent for service of process.11    2. The decedent's name is            ;12    3. The date of the decedent's death was            , and I 13have attached a copy of the death certificate hereto.14    4. The decedent's place of residence immediately before 15his death was            ;16    5. No letters of office are now outstanding on the 17decedent's estate and no petition for letters is contemplated 18or pending in Illinois or in any other jurisdiction, to my 19knowledge;20    6. (a) Excluding motor vehicles registered with the 21Secretary of State, the decedent's entire personal estate The 22gross value of the decedent's entire personal estate, 23including the value of all property passing to any party 24either by intestacy or under a will, does not exceed $150,000 25$100,000. (Here, list each asset, e.g., cash, stock, and its 26fair market value.); and  SB0083 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 02999 LNS 13017 b1    (b) Any motor vehicles registered with the Secretary of 2State in the decedent's entire personal estate passing to any 3party either by intestacy or under a will. (Here, list a 4description of each motor vehicle by make, body type, year, 5and vehicle identification number.); 6    7. (a) All of the decedent's funeral expenses and other 7debts have been paid, or8    (b) All of the decedent's known unpaid debts are listed 9and classified as follows (include the name, post office 10address, and amount):11    Class 1: funeral and burial expenses, which include 12    reasonable amounts paid for a burial space, crypt, or 13    niche; a marker on the burial space; and care of the burial 14    space, crypt, or niche; expenses of administration; and 15    statutory custodial claims as follows:16    .........................................................17    Class 2: the surviving spouse's award or child's award, if 18    applicable, as follows:19    .........................................................20    Class 3: debts due the United States, as follows:21    .........................................................22    Class 4: money due employees of the decedent of not more 23    than $800 for each claimant for services rendered within 4 24    months prior to the decedent's death and expenses 25    attending the last illness, as follows:26    .........................................................  SB0083 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 02999 LNS 13017 b1    Class 5: money and property received or held in trust by 2    the decedent which cannot be identified or traced, as 3    follows:4    .........................................................5    Class 6: debts due the State of Illinois and any county, 6    township, city, town, village, or school district located 7    within Illinois, as follows:8    .........................................................9    Class 7: all other claims, as follows:10    ................................11(Strike either 7(a) or 7(b)).12    7.5. I understand that all valid claims against the 13decedent's estate described in paragraph 7 must be paid by me 14from the decedent's estate before any distribution is made to 15any heir or legatee. I further understand that the decedent's 16estate should pay all claims in the order set forth above, and 17if the decedent's estate is insufficient to pay the claims in 18any one class, the claims in that class shall be paid pro rata.19    8. There is no known unpaid claimant or contested claim 20against the decedent, except as stated in paragraph 7.21    9. (a) The names and places of residence of any surviving 22spouse, minor children and adult dependent* children of the 23decedent are as follows:24Name andPlace ofAge of25RelationshipResidenceminor child   SB0083 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 02999 LNS 13017 b1*(Note: An adult dependent child is one who is unable to 2maintain himself and is likely to become a public charge.)3    (b) The award allowable to the surviving spouse of a 4decedent who was an Illinois resident is $.......... ($20,000, 5plus $10,000 multiplied by the number of minor children and 6adult dependent children who resided with the surviving spouse 7at the time of the decedent's death. If any such child did not 8reside with the surviving spouse at the time of the decedent's 9death, so indicate).10    (c) If there is no surviving spouse, the award allowable 11to the minor children and adult dependent children of a 12decedent who was an Illinois resident is $.......... ($20,000, 13plus $10,000 multiplied by the number of minor children and 14adult dependent children), to be divided among them in equal 15shares.16    10. (a) The decedent left no will. The names, places of 17residence and relationships of the decedent's heirs, and the 18portion of the estate to which each heir is entitled under the 19law where decedent died intestate are as follows:20Name, relationshipAge ofPortion of21and place of residenceminorEstate22OR23    (b) The decedent left a will, which has been filed with the 24clerk of an appropriate court. A certified copy of the will on 25file is attached. To the best of my knowledge and belief the 26will on file is the decedent's last will and was signed by the   SB0083 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 02999 LNS 13017 b1decedent and the attesting witnesses as required by law and 2would be admittable to probate. The names and places of 3residence of the legatees and the portion of the estate, if 4any, to which each legatee is entitled are as follows:5Name, relationshipAge ofPortion of6and place of residenceminorEstate 7    (Strike either 10(a) or 10(b)).8    (c) Affiant is unaware of any dispute or potential 9conflict as to the heirship or will of the decedent.10    10.3. My relationship to the decedent or the decedent's 11estate is as follows:....................................12    10.5. (The following paragraph should appear in bold type 13and in not less than 14-point font):14        I understand that the decedent's estate must be 15    distributed first to satisfy claims against the decedent's 16    estate as set forth in paragraph 7.5 of this affidavit 17    before any distribution is made to any heir or legatee. By 18    signing this affidavit, I agree to indemnify and hold 19    harmless all creditors of the decedent's estate, the 20    decedent's heirs and legatees, and other persons, 21    corporations, or financial institutions relying upon this 22    affidavit who incur any loss because of reliance on this 23    affidavit, up to the amount lost because of any act or 24    omission by me. I further understand that any person, 25    corporation, or financial institution recovering under   SB0083 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 02999 LNS 13017 b1    this indemnification provision shall be entitled to 2    reasonable attorney's fees and the expenses of recovery.3    11. After payment by me from the decedent's estate of all 4debts and expenses listed in paragraph 7, any remaining 5property described in paragraph 6 of this affidavit should be 6distributed as follows: 7    Name        Specific sum or property to be distributed  8The foregoing statement is made under the penalties of 9perjury*.10.........................11Signature of Affiant     12Signed and sworn before me on (insert date). 13.........................14Notary Public 15*(Note: A fraudulent statement made under the penalties of 16perjury is perjury, as defined in Section 32-2 of the Criminal 17Code of 2012.)18    (c) Appointment of Agent. If safe deposit access is 19involved or if sale of any personal property is desirable to 20facilitate distribution pursuant to the small estate 21affidavit, the affiant under the small estate affidavit may in 22writing appoint one or more persons as the affiant's agent for   SB0083 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 02999 LNS 13017 b1that purpose. The agent shall have power, without court 2approval, to gain access to, sell, and distribute the property 3in the manner specified in paragraphs 7.5 and 11 of the 4affidavit; and the payment, delivery, transfer, access or 5issuance shall be made or granted to or on the order of the 6agent. The affiant may appoint himself or herself as the 7designated representative to exercise the powers and perform 8the duties of an agent described in this subsection (c). 9    (d) Reliance and Release. Any person, corporation, or 10financial institution who acts in good faith reliance on a 11copy of a document purporting to be a small estate affidavit 12that is substantially in compliance with subsection (b) of 13this Section shall be fully protected and released upon 14payment, delivery, transfer, access or issuance pursuant to 15such a document to the same extent as if the payment, delivery, 16transfer, access or issuance had been made or granted to the 17representative of the estate. Such person, corporation, or 18financial institution is not required to see to the 19application or disposition of the property; but each person to 20whom a payment, delivery, transfer, access or issuance is made 21or given is answerable therefor to any person having a prior 22right and is accountable to any representative of the estate.23    (e) Distributions pursuant to an affidavit substantially 24in the form set forth in subsection (b) of this Section may be 25made to the affiant, if so specified in paragraph 11, 26notwithstanding the disclosure of known unpaid debts. The   SB0083 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 02999 LNS 13017 b1affiant, acting on behalf of the decedent's estate, is 2obligated to pay all valid claims against the decedent's 3estate before any distribution is made to any heir or legatee. 4The affiant signing the small estate affidavit prepared 5pursuant to subsection (b) of this Section shall indemnify and 6hold harmless all creditors, heirs, and legatees of the 7decedent and other persons, corporations, or financial 8institutions relying upon the affidavit who incur loss because 9of such reliance. That indemnification shall only be up to the 10amount lost because of the act or omission of the affiant. Any 11person, corporation, or financial institution recovering under 12this subsection (e) shall be entitled to reasonable attorney's 13fees and the expenses of recovery.14    (f) The affiant of a small estate affidavit who is a 15non-resident of Illinois submits himself or herself to the 16jurisdiction of Illinois courts for all matters related to the 17preparation or use of the affidavit. The affidavit shall 18provide the name, address, and phone number of a person whom 19the affiant names as his agent for service of process. If no 20such person is named or if, for any reason, service on the 21named person cannot be effectuated, the clerk of the circuit 22court of the county or judicial circuit of which the decedent 23was a resident at the time of his death shall be the agent for 24service of process.25    (g) Any action properly taken under this Section, as 26amended by Public Act 93-877, on or after August 6, 2004 (the   SB0083 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 02999 LNS 13017 b1effective date of Public Act 93-877) is valid regardless of 2the date of death of the decedent. 3    (h) The changes made by this amendatory Act of the 96th 4General Assembly apply to a decedent whose date of death is on 5or after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 96th 6General Assembly. 7    (i) The changes made by this amendatory Act of the 98th 8General Assembly apply to a decedent whose date of death is on 9or after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 98th 10General Assembly.11    (j) The changes made by this amendatory Act of the 104th 12General Assembly apply to a decedent whose date of death is on 13or after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th 14General Assembly. 15(Source: P.A. 97-1150, eff. 1-25-13; 98-836, eff. 1-1-15.) 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.